Maryland, session 2026, SB0694.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Government
20–1004.
(a) Any person claiming to be aggrieved by an alleged discriminatory act may file
a complaint with the Commission.
(c) (1) (i) Except as provided in paragraphs (2) and (3) of this subsection, a
complaint shall be filed within 6 months after the date on which the alleged discriminatory
act occurred.
– 1 –

Ch. 172 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(ii) A complaint filed with a federal or local human relations
commission within 6 months after the date on which the alleged discriminatory act occurred
shall be deemed to have complied with subparagraph (i) of this paragraph.
(2) (i) A complaint alleging an unlawful employment practice other
than harassment shall be filed within 300 days after the date on which the alleged
discriminatory act occurred.
(ii) A complaint filed with a federal human relations commission
within 6 months or a local human relations commission within 300 days shall be deemed
to have complied with subparagraph (i) of this paragraph.
(3) (i) A complaint alleging harassment against an employer shall be
filed within 2 years after the date on which the alleged harassment occurred.
(ii) A complaint filed with a federal human relations commission
within 6 months or a local human relations commission within 2 years after the date on
which the alleged harassment occurred shall be deemed to have complied with
subparagraph (i) of this paragraph.
20–1202.
(a) This section applies only in Howard County, Montgomery County, and Prince
George’s County.
(b) In accordance with this section, a person that is subjected to a discriminatory
act prohibited by the county code may bring and maintain a civil action against the person
that committed the alleged discriminatory act for damages, injunctive relief, or other civil
relief.
(c) (1) An action under subsection (b) of this section shall be commenced in the
circuit court for the county in which the alleged discriminatory act occurred within 2 years
after the occurrence of the alleged discriminatory act.
(2) (i) Subject to paragraph (1) of this subsection, an action under
subsection (b) of this section alleging discrimination in employment or public
accommodations may not be commenced sooner than 45 days after the aggrieved person
files a complaint with:
1. the county unit responsible for handling violations of the
county discrimination laws; OR
2. THE COMMISSION, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 20–1004
OF THIS TITLE.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 172
(ii) Subject to paragraph (1) of this subsection, an action under
subsection (b) of this section alleging discrimination in real estate may be commenced at
any time.
(d) In a civil action under this section, the court may award the prevailing party
reasonable attorney’s fees, expert witness fees, and costs.
20–1203.
(a) This section applies only in Baltimore County.
(b) In accordance with this section, a person that is employed by an employer with
fewer than 15 employees and that is subjected to a discriminatory act prohibited by the
county code may bring and maintain a civil action against the employer that committed the
alleged discriminatory act for relief as provided under subsection (d) of this section.
(c) (1) An action under subsection (b) of this section shall be commenced in the
Circuit Court for Baltimore County within 2 years after the occurrence of the alleged
discriminatory act.
(2) Subject to paragraph (1) of this subsection, an action under subsection
(b) of this section may not be commenced sooner than 60 days after the aggrieved person
files a complaint with:
(I) the county unit responsible for handling violations of the county
discrimination laws; OR
(II) THE COMMISSION, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 20–1004 OF
THIS TITLE.
(d) (1) In a civil action under this section, the court may award the prevailing
party:
(i) injunctive relief;
(ii) compensatory damages, including back pay; or
(iii) both injunctive relief and compensatory damages.
(2) A prevailing party may not be awarded punitive damages under this
section.
(3) The court may award the prevailing party reasonable attorney’s fees.
20–1204.
– 3 –

Ch. 172 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES IN ANY COUNTY OTHER THAN BALTIMORE
COUNTY, HOWARD COUNTY, MONTGOMERY COUNTY, OR PRINCE GEORGE’S
COUNTY.
(B) A COMPLAINT FILED IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 20–1004 OF THIS TITLE
SATISFIES ANY REQUIREMENT TO EXHAUST REMEDIES BEFORE FILING A CIVIL
ACTION IMPOSED BY A COUNTY OR LOCAL UNIT RESPONSIBLE FOR HANDLING
VIOLATIONS OF COUNTY OR LOCAL DISCRIMINATION LAWS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, April 28, 2026.
– 4 –